Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-2103
Public power supplier, defined.

For purposes of the Public Power Infrastructure Protection Act, public power supplier means a public power district organized under Chapter 70, article 6, a public power and irrigation district, a municipality, a registered group of municipalities, an electric cooperative, an electric membership association, a joint entity formed under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, a joint public agency formed under the Joint Public Agency Act, an agency formed under the Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, or any other governmental entity providing electric service.

Laws 2009, LB238, § 5.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.

Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, see section 18-2401.